Maine, session 132, LD1320.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2421-A, sub-§19, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. A, §3, is
amended by enacting at the end a new blocked paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding paragraphs B or C, "disqualifying drug offense" includes a conviction that
has occurred within the 3-year period prior to the date of application for or renewal of a
license under this chapter for a crime related to the cultivation or distribution of cannabis
that is not authorized in this chapter, in the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter or in Title
28-B.
Sec. 2. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§28, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3, is
amended by enacting at the end a new blocked paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding paragraph C, "disqualifying drug offense" includes a conviction that has
occurred within the 3-year period prior to the date of application for or for renewal of a
registry identification card or a registration certificate under this chapter for a crime related
to the cultivation or distribution of cannabis that is not authorized in this chapter, in the
rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, in chapter 3 or in the Maine Medical Use of Cannabis
Act.